Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) It is  the policy of this state to pursue a goal of attaining a statewide
homeownership rate,  as determined by the American Community Survey of the United States
Census Bureau, in aggregate  and for each disaggregated racial or ethnic population for which
demographic data is provided, of:
(a) At least 65.05 percent by 2030;
(b) At least 1.65 percent more than the goal in paragraph (a) of this subsection by 2035;
(c) At least 1.65  percent more than the goal in paragraph (b) of this subsection by 2040;
and
(d) At least 1.65 percent more than the  goal in paragraph (c) of this subsection by 2045
and in subsequent years.
(2) This section does not create any additional authority  for the executive department,
as defined in ORS 174.112.
SECTION 2.
The Housing and Community Services Department shall create, and annually
update, a publicly  available homeownership goal dashboard that includes tracking of the
progress, based on the homeownership rate, toward the homeownership goal under  section
1 of this 2025 Act:
(1) For the entire state, in aggregate and disaggregated by race and ethnicity; and
(2) For each region that is  established under ORS 184.453 (1), in aggregate and disaggre-
gated by race and ethnicity.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House April 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2698 (HB 2698-A) Page 2